District of Columbia statutes.
5-117.04

Interference with police.

Any willful interference with the Chief of Police, or with any member of the police force, by any of the persons named in § 5-117.01 [repealed], while in official and due discharge of duty, shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

R.S., D.C., § 407
1981 Ed., § 4-150.
1973 Ed., § 4-150.
Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.